Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB873.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "local agency" in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Local agency." Any of the following:(1) Any political subdivision, intermediate unit, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 charter school, cyber charter school or public trade or vocational school.(2) Any local, intergovernmental, regional or municipal agency, authority, council, board, commission or similar governmental entity.(3) An association as defined in 68 Pa.C.S. § 5103 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0873PN0989 - 2 - 123456789